Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1762
Collection of taxes; failure to pay taxes collected by county treasurer; liability on bond.

The bond of every county treasurer shall be held to be security for the payment by such treasurer to the State Treasurer and the several cities, towns, villages, and the proper authorities and persons, respectively, of all taxes and special assessments which may be collected or received by him on their behalf, by virtue of any law in force at the time of giving such bond, or that may be passed or take effect thereafter.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 186, p. 456;

R.S.1913, § 6514;

C.S.1922, § 6042;

C.S.1929, § 77-1947;

R.S.1943, § 77-1762.

Payment of funds in hands of county treasurer to successor is effectuated only by delivery of money. Lancaster County v. State, 74 Neb. 211, 104 N.W. 187 (1905), affirmed on rehearing 74 Neb. 215, 107 N.W. 388 (1906); Cedar County v. Jenal, 14 Neb. 254, 15 N.W. 369 (1883).